Massachusetts, session 194th, S1257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 32N the
following section:-
Section 32O. (a) A person who, while in the course of trafficking or unlawfully
distributing a controlled substance as defined in section 32E, knowingly or intentionally
manufactures, distributes, dispenses, delivers, gives away, barters, administers or provides any
amount of a controlled substance or counterfeit substance which results in death shall be
punished as murder in the second degree as defined by section 1 of chapter 265.
(b) Lack of knowledge of a previous health condition shall not be a defense to a violation
of this section.
of 1